Utah statutes.
31A-22-904.   Beneficiaries in fraternal contracts.

(1)  Any member may designate as beneficiary any person permitted by the laws of the fraternal.  Those laws shall allow the designation of the member's estate as beneficiary.

(2)  Subject to Subsection (1), Section 31A-22-413 applies.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

